New Mexico, session 2026, SB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years to sustain and expand comprehensive and affordable statewide out-of-school time programming for school-age youth statewide. From the amount appropriated, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be for school districts, charter schools, the United States department of the interior's bureau of Indian education schools and tribally controlled schools, and ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be for contracting with local and statewide nonprofit community organizations that provide out-of-school time programming. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. - 2 -